Utah statutes.
58-64-102.   Definitions.
In addition to the definitions in Section 58-1-102, as used in this chapter:
(1)  "Board" means the Deception Detection Examiners Board created in Section
58-64-201.
(2)  "Deception detection examination" means the use of an instrument on an
individual for the purpose of detecting whether that individual is engaged in
deception.
(3)  "Deception detection examiner" means an individual who engages in or
represents that the individual is engaged in conducting or performing
deception detection examinations or in the interpretation of deception
detection examinations.
(4)  "Deception detection intern" means an individual who engages in deception
detection examinations under the supervision and control of a deception
detection examiner for the purpose of training and qualification as a
deception detection examiner.
(5)  "Instrument" means a polygraph, voice stress analyzer, or any other
device that records the examinee's cardiovascular patterns, respiratory
patterns, galvanic skin response, or other physiologic characteristics of the
examinee for the purpose of monitoring factors relating to whether the
examinee is truthful or engaged in deception.
(6)  "Unlawful conduct" is as defined in Sections 58-1-501 and 58-64-501.
(7)  "Unprofessional conduct" is as defined in Sections 58-1-501 and 58-64-502
and as may be further defined by rule.
